California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution. The election on the ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax shall occur on or after November 6, 2018, and before January 1, 2026.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(c) The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision, except for the change made to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) requiring the ordinance to be approved by the voters prior to January 1, 2026, do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.77. Local Government Finance in the City of Pinole Transactions and Use Tax [7292.9.1. - 7292.9.2.]

7292.9.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Pinole, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The City Council of the City of Pinole adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement. This paragraph shall not apply to a tax imposed by citizens’ initiative.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7292.9.2.)
-------------------------------------------

7292.9.2.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved pursuant to Section 7292.9.1, this chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.77, commencing with Section 7292.9.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.8. Local Government Finance in the City of El Cerrito [7293. - 7294.]

7293.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of El Cerrito may impose a transactions and use tax for general purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that, in combination with all taxes imposed pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), would exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city adopts an
 ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax subject to any applicable voter approval requirement.

(2) The city ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate of the adopting city, as applicable, and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance as required by Article XIIIC of the California Constitution. The election on the ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax may occur on or after November 4, 2014.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(4) The transactions and use tax is imposed on or after January 1, 2015.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), an ordinance proposing a
 transactions and use tax pursuant to this section shall become operative as provided in Section 7265.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, the tax rate authorized in subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   (AB 1324)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 7294.)
-------------------------------------------

7294.

If, as of January 1, 2022, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7293, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   (AB 1324)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.8, commencing with Section 7293.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.81. County of Solano Transactions and Use Tax for General or Specific Purposes [7294.1. - 7294.2.]

7294.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Solano, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The County of Solano Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement. This paragraph shall not apply to a tax imposed by citizens’ initiative.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7294.2.)
-------------------------------------------

7294.2.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7294.1, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.81, commencing with Section 7294.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.82. Local Government Finance in the Cities within the County of Solano [7294.3. - 7294.4.]

7294.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any city within the County of Solano, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of any city within the County of Solano adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement. This paragraph shall not apply to a tax imposed by citizens’ initiative.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) This section shall not apply to any city within the County of Solano
 that has not approved, on or before January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 4.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7294.4.)
-------------------------------------------

7294.4.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved by any city within the County of Solano, as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7294.3, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 4.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.82, commencing with Section 7294.3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.83. San Luis Obispo Council of Governments Transactions and Use Tax [7294.5. - 7294.5.]

7294.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the San Luis Obispo Council of Governments, established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met: 

(1) The San Luis Obispo Council of Governments adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is approved by the voters on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.

(4) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (SB 333)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.85. County of Santa Cruz Transactions and Use Tax [7294.7. - 7294.7.]

7294.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Santa Cruz may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes to support countywide programs at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The Santa Cruz County Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2030, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the County of
 Santa Cruz as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 13.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.85, commencing with Section 7294.7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.9. Local Government Finance in the County of San Mateo [7295. - 7296.]

7295.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of San Mateo may, in accordance with the requirements of the Bay Area County Traffic and Transportation Funding Act (Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 131000) of the Public Utilities Code) relating to the imposition of transactions and use taxes, impose a transactions and use tax for the support of countywide transportation programs at a rate of
 no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1.

(b) The county shall not act pursuant to this section if a retail transactions and use tax has been imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 103350 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.   (AB 1613)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 7296.)
-------------------------------------------

7296.

If the ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is not approved as required by Section 7295, this chapter shall be repealed as of January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (SB 705)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.9, commencing with Section 7295.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.91. Local Government Finance in the County of Monterey [7297. - 7298.]

7297.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Transportation Agency for Monterey County may impose a transactions and use tax for the support of countywide transportation programs at a rate of no more than 0.375 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The Transportation Agency for Monterey County adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(b) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with Article XIII   C of the California Constitution.

(c) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), other than Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (SB 705)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 7298.)
-------------------------------------------

7298.

If the ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is not approved as required by subdivision (b) of Section 7297, this chapter shall be repealed as of January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (SB 705)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.91, commencing with Section 7297.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.92. Local Government Finance in the City of Berkeley  [7299. - 7299.]

7299.

Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Berkeley may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The city adopts an ordinance
 proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(b) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(c) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 771, Sec. 10.   (AB 2920)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.93. Local Government Finance in the County of Ventura [7300. - 7300.1.]

7300.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Ventura may impose a transactions and use tax for the support of countywide transportation programs at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The County of Ventura
 adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall
 not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 391, Sec. 2.   (SB 335)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 7300.1.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.1.

If an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax authorized by this chapter is not approved pursuant to Section 7300, this chapter shall be repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.93, commencing with Section 7300.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.94. Local Government Finance in the County of Humboldt [7300.3. - 7300.4.]

7300.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Humboldt County Board of Supervisors may impose a transactions and use tax for the support of countywide transportation programs and general services at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The Humboldt County Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved
 by the voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (AB 1256)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 7300.4.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.4.

If an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax authorized by this chapter is not approved pursuant to Section 7300.3, this chapter shall be repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (AB 1256)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.94, commencing with Section 7300.3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.95. Monterey-Salinas Transit District Transactions and Use Tax [7300.5. - 7300.6.]

7300.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Monterey-Salinas Transit District, created pursuant to Part 17 (commencing with Section 106000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code, may impose a transactions and use tax for the support of its transportation services in accordance with Section 106060 of the Public Utilities Code at a rate of no more than 0.25 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The district adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by an affirmative vote
 of at least two-thirds of the board of directors.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, the tax rate authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (AB 761)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2035, pursuant to Sec. 7300.6)
-------------------------------------------

7300.6.

If, as of January 1, 2035, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved pursuant to Section 7300.5, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (AB 761)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.95, commencing with Section 7300.5.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX LAW [7301. - 8526.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [7301. - 7345.]

7301.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax Law.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

“Aircraft” means any powered contrivance designed for navigation in the air except a rocket or missile.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7304.

“Alcohol” includes ethanol and methanol.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

“Approved terminal or refinery” means a terminal or refinery that is operated by a licensed supplier.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7306.

“Aviation gasoline” means all special grades of gasoline that are suitable for use in aviation reciprocating engines.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7307.

“Blended motor vehicle fuel” means any mixture of motor vehicle fuel with respect to which tax has been imposed and any other liquid on which tax has not been imposed. Blended motor vehicle fuel also means any conversion of a liquid into motor vehicle fuel. “Conversion of a liquid into motor vehicle fuel” occurs when any liquid that is not included in the definition of motor vehicle fuel and that is outside the bulk transfer/terminal system is sold as motor vehicle fuel, delivered as motor vehicle fuel, or represented to be motor vehicle
 fuel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7308.

“Blender” includes any person that produces or converts blended motor vehicle fuel outside the bulk transfer/terminal system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.

“Bulk transfer” means any transfer of motor vehicle fuel by pipeline or vessel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7310.

“Bulk transfer/terminal system” means the motor vehicle fuel distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Motor vehicle fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk transfer/terminal system. Motor vehicle fuel in the fuel tank of any engine, or in any railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer/terminal system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.

“Enterer” includes any person who is the importer of record (under federal customs law) with respect to motor vehicle fuel. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is acting is the enterer. If there is no importer of record of motor vehicle fuel entered into this state, the owner of the motor vehicle fuel at the time it is brought into this state is the enterer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7312.

“Entry” means the importing of motor vehicle fuel into this state. However, motor vehicle fuel brought into this state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle or aircraft shall not be deemed to be an “entry” if not removed from the fuel tank except as used for the operation of that motor vehicle or aircraft, except to the extent that the motor vehicle fuel was acquired tax free for export or a refund of tax was claimed as a result of exportation from the state from which that motor vehicle fuel was transported into this
 state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7313.

“Finished gasoline” means all products (including gasohol) that are commonly known or sold as gasoline.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7314.

“Fuel tank” means any receptacle on a motor vehicle from which fuel is supplied for the operation of a motor vehicle.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7315.

“Gallon” means the United States gallon of 231 cubic inches or the volumetric gallon adjusted to 60 degrees Fahrenheit when the invoice and settlement is made on the temperature corrected gallonage.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7316.

“Gasoline” means finished gasoline and gasoline blendstocks.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7317.

“Gasoline blendstocks” means any petroleum product component of gasoline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7318.

“Gasohol” means all blends of gasoline, and alcohol containing more than 15 percent gasoline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7319.

“Highway” includes a way or place, of whatever nature, publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.

“Highway vehicle operator/fueler” includes:

(a) Any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle and delivers, or causes to be delivered, motor vehicle fuel or any liquid into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle; or

(b) Any person who sells motor vehicle fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed, or who sells and delivers or
 causes to be delivered into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle any liquid on which tax has not been imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 12.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7321.

“In this state” or “in the state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7322.

“Industrial user” means any person that receives gasoline blendstocks by bulk transfer for its own use in the manufacture of any product other than finished gasoline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7323.

“Licensed industrial user” means any industrial user that is licensed pursuant to Section 7460.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7324.

“Licensed supplier” includes any enterer, position holder, refiner, terminal operator, or throughputter that is licensed as a supplier pursuant to Section 7451.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7325.

“Motor vehicle” includes every self-propelled vehicle operated or suitable for operation on the highway, except a vehicle used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7326.

“Motor vehicle fuel” means gasoline and aviation gasoline. It does not include jet fuel, diesel fuel, kerosene, liquefied petroleum gas, natural gas in liquid or gaseous form, alcohol, or racing fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 605, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7327.

“Motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is operated by a motor vehicle fuel-powered engine on a highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7328.

“Motor vehicle fuel-powered train” means any motor vehicle fuel-powered equipment or machinery that rides on rails, including equipment or machinery that transports passengers, freight, or a combination of both passengers and freight, and equipment or machinery that only carries freight or passengers of the operator thereof. Thus, the term includes a locomotive, work train, switching engine, and track maintenance machine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7329.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, the United States, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7330.

“Pipeline” means a fuel distribution system that moves motor vehicle fuel, in bulk, through a pipe, from a refinery to a terminal, from a terminal to another terminal, from a vessel to a terminal, or from a refinery or terminal to a vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 14.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7331.

“Pipeline operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7332.

“Position holder” includes any person that holds the inventory position in the motor vehicle fuel, as reflected on the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position in motor vehicle fuel when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for the use of storage facilities and terminaling services at a terminal with respect to the motor vehicle fuel. “Position holder” includes a terminal operator that owns motor vehicle fuel in its terminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7333.

“Rack” means a mechanism for delivering motor vehicle fuel from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railroad car, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7334.

“Refiner” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a refinery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7335.

“Refinery” means a facility used to produce motor vehicle fuel from crude oil, unfinished oils, natural gas liquids, or other hydrocarbons, and from which motor vehicle fuel may be removed by pipeline, by vessel, or at a rack.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7336.

“Removal” means any physical transfer of motor vehicle fuel, and any use of motor vehicle fuel other than as a material in the production of motor vehicle fuel. However, motor vehicle fuel is not removed when it evaporates or is otherwise lost or destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7337.

“Sale” means:

(a) The transfer of title to motor vehicle fuel (other than motor vehicle fuel in a terminal) to a buyer for consideration, which may consist of money, services, or other property.

(b) The transfer of the inventory position in the motor vehicle fuel in a terminal if the buyer becomes the position holder with respect to the motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 15.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7338.

“Supplier” includes any person who is any of the following:

(a) Blender, as defined in Section 7308.

(b) Enterer, as defined in Section 7311.

(c) Position holder, as defined in Section 7332.

(d) Refiner, as defined in Section 7334.

(e) Terminal operator, as defined in Section 7340.

(f) Throughputter, as defined in Section 7341.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7339.

“Terminal” means a motor vehicle fuel storage and distribution facility that is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which motor vehicle fuel may be removed at a rack. “Terminal” includes a fuel production facility where motor vehicle fuel is produced and stored and from which motor vehicle fuel may be removed at a rack.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 3.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7339.1.

“Fuel production facility” means a facility, other than a refinery, in which motor vehicle fuel is produced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 4.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7340.

“Terminal operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a terminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7341.

“Throughputter” means any person that owns motor vehicle fuel within the bulk transfer/terminal system (other than in a terminal) or is a position holder.
